en: Control arm grease fitting type: Greasable (zerk included); Greasable (zerk not included); Not specified; Sealed (non-greasable); Serviceable/replaceable joint; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de encaixe de lubrificação do braço de controlo: Lubrificável (engraxadeira incluída); Lubrificável (engraxadeira não incluída); Não especificado; Selado (não lubrificável); Junta reparável/substituível; Outro
da: Type smørenippel til styrearm: Kan smøres (smørenippel medfølger); Kan smøres (smørenippel medfølger ikke); Ikke angivet; Forseglet (kan ikke smøres); Vedligeholdelsesvenligt/udskifteligt led; Anden
nb: Smørenippeltype for kontrollarm: Smørbar (smørenippel inkludert); Smørbar (smørenippel ikke inkludert); Ikke spesifisert; Forseglet (ikke smørbar); Servicevennlig/utskiftbart ledd; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de graxeira do braço de controle: Lubrificável (graxeira incluída); Lubrificável (graxeira não incluída); Não especificado; Selado (não lubrificável); Junta manutenível/substituível; Outro
pl: Typ smarowniczki wahacza: Smarowalny (smarowniczka w zestawie); Smarowalny (brak smarowniczki w zestawie); Nie określono; Uszczelniony (niesmarowalny); Złącze serwisowalne/wymienne; Inny
zh-CN: 控制臂润滑脂嘴类型: 可注脂（含注油嘴）; 可注脂（不含注油嘴）; 未指定; 密封（不可注脂）; 可维护/可更换接头; 其他
tr: Salıncak kolu gresörlük tipi: Greslenebilir (gresörlük dahil); Greslenebilir (gresörlük dahil değil); Belirtilmemiş; Sızdırmaz (greslenemez); Bakımı yapılabilir/değiştirilebilir mafsal; Diğer
cs: Typ mazacího prvku příčného ramene: Promazávatelné (včetně maznice); Promazávatelné (maznice není součástí); Nespecifikováno; Utěsněné (nepromazávatelné); Opravitelný/vyměnitelný kloub; Jiné
th: ประเภทของหัวอัดจาระบีของปีกนก: อัดจาระบีได้ (รวมหัวอัดจาระบี); อัดจาระบีได้ (ไม่รวมหัวอัดจาระบี); ไม่ระบุ; ซีลปิด (อัดจาระบีไม่ได้); ข้อต่อซ่อมบำรุง/เปลี่ยนได้; อื่นๆ
nl: Regelarm smeernippeltype: Smeerbaar (inclusief smeernippel); Smeerbaar (exclusief smeernippel); Niet gespecificeerd; Afgedicht (niet-smeerbaar); Onderhoudbaar/vervangbaar gewricht; Overig
lt-LT: Valdymo svirties tepimo jungties tipas: Tepamas (su tepimo įmova); Tepamas (be tepimo įmovos); Nenurodyta; Sandarus (netepamas); Aptarnaujama / keičiama jungtis; Kita
sk-SK: Typ mazacej súpravy ovládacieho ramena: Mazateľné (maznica súčasťou); Mazateľné (maznica nie je súčasťou); Nešpecifikované; Utesnené (nemazateľné); Servisovateľný/vymeniteľný kĺb; Iné
zh-TW: 控制臂注油嘴類型: 可注油 (含黃油嘴); 可注油 (不含黃油嘴); 未指定; 密封式 (不可注油); 可維修/可更換接頭; 其他
hu: Vezérlőkar zsírzógombjának típusa: Zsírozható (zsírzógombbal); Zsírozható (zsírzógomb nélkül); Nincs megadva; Zárt (nem zsírozható); Szervizelhető/cserélhető csukló; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta mazalnega nastavka krmilne ročice: Primerno za mazanje (mazalka priložena); Primerno za mazanje (mazalka ni priložena); Ni določeno; Zaprto (ni primerno za mazanje); Zglob, ki ga je mogoče servisirati/zamenjati; Drugo
es: Tipo de engrasador del brazo de control: Engrasable (engrasador zerk incluido); Engrasable (engrasador zerk no incluido); No especificado; Sellado (no engrasable); Rótula reparable/reemplazable; Otro
de: Schmiernippeltyp des Querlenkers: Schmierbar (Schmiernippel inklusive); Schmierbar (Schmiernippel nicht inklusive); Keine Angabe; Versiegelt (nicht schmierbar); Wartbares/austauschbares Gelenk; Sonstige
sv: Smörjnippeltyp för styrarmen: Smörjbar (smörjnippel ingår); Smörjbar (smörjnippel ingår ej); Ej specificerad; Förseglad (ej smörjbar); Servicerbar/utbytbar led; Annan
ko: 컨트롤 암 그리스 주입구 유형: 그리스 주입 가능(제르크 포함); 그리스 주입 가능(제르크 미포함); 지정되지 않음; 밀봉형(그리스 주입 불가); 정비/교체 가능 조인트; 기타
fr: Type de graisseur du bras de suspension: Graissable (graisseur inclus); Graissable (graisseur non inclus); Non spécifié; Scellé (non graissable); Rotule réparable/remplaçable; Autre
ja: コントロールアームグリースニップルタイプ: グリスアップ可能 (グリスニップル付属); グリスアップ可能 (グリスニップルなし); 指定なし; 密閉型 (グリスアップ不可); メンテナンス / 交換可能ジョイント; その他
ru: Тип пресс-масленки рычага подвески: Обслуживаемый (пресс-маслёнка в комплекте); Обслуживаемый (пресс-маслёнка не в комплекте); Не указано; Герметичный (необслуживаемый); Обслуживаемый / сменный шарнир; Другое
el: Τύπος γρασαδόρου (λιπαντικού ρακόρ) του βραχίονα ελέγχου: Λιπαινόμενο (περιλαμβάνεται γρασαδόρος); Λιπαινόμενο (δεν περιλαμβάνεται γρασαδόρος); Δεν καθορίζεται; Σφραγισμένο (μη λιπαινόμενο); Επισκευάσιμος/αντικαταστάσιμος σύνδεσμος; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tipul de racord de ungere al brațului de control: Gresabil (gresor inclus); Gresabil (gresor neinclus); Nespecificat; Sigilat (negresabil); Articulație reparabilă/înlocuibilă; Altele
vi: Loại đầu bôi trơn cần điều khiển: Có thể bơm mỡ (bao gồm zerk); Có thể bơm mỡ (không bao gồm zerk); Chưa xác định; Kín (không bơm mỡ được); Khớp nối có thể bảo dưỡng/thay thế; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta mazalice upravljačke vilice: S mogućnošću podmazivanja (mazalica uključena); S mogućnošću podmazivanja (mazalica nije uključena); Nije navedeno; Zatvoreno (bez mogućnosti podmazivanja); Servisni / zamjenjivi zglob; Ostalo
it: Tipo di raccordo per grasso del braccio di controllo: Ingrassabile (ingrassatore incluso); Ingrassabile (ingrassatore non incluso); Non specificato; Sigillato (non ingrassabile); Giunto riparabile/sostituibile; Altro
fi: Tukivarren rasvanipan tyyppi: Voideltava (rasvanippa mukana); Voideltava (rasvanippa ei mukana); Ei määritetty; Suljettu (ei-voideltava); Huollettava/vaihdettava nivel; Muu
bg-BG: Тип гресиращ нипел на носача: Може да се гресира (с включена гресьорка); Може да се гресира (без включена гресьорка); Не е посочено; Запечатан (не може да се гресира); Обслужваем/сменяем шарнир; Друг